Nebraska, session 109, LB1051.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1051 LB1051
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 85-179.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
85-179.02 For purposes of sections 85-179.01 to 85-179.03, unless
the context otherwise requires, physicians' assistant or physicians'
associate means shall mean a person who is qualified by training and
experience to act as an assistant to, or an associate of, a licensed
physician.
Sec. 2. Original section 85-179.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-